North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 3A. Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.

§ 39-23.1.
Definitions.

In this Article, the following definitions apply:

Affiliate. — Any of the following:

A person that directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, twenty percent (20%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person that holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole discretionary power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not in fact exercised the power to vote.

A corporation twenty percent (20%) or more of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held with power to vote, by the debtor or a person that directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds, with power to vote,
twenty percent (20%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person that holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole discretionary power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not in fact exercised the power to vote.

A person whose business is operated by the debtor under a lease or other agreement, or a person substantially all of whose assets are controlled by the debtor.

A person that operates the debtor’s business under a lease or other agreement or controls substantially all of the debtor’s assets.

Asset. — Property of a debtor, but the term does not include any of the following:

Property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid lien.

Property to the extent it is generally exempt under nonbankruptcy law.

An interest in property held in tenancy by the entireties to the extent it is not subject to process by a creditor holding a claim against only one tenant.

Claim. — Except as used in “claim for relief,” a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured.

Creditor. — A person that has a claim.

Debt. — Liability on a claim.

Debtor. — A person that is liable on a claim.

(6a)
Electronic. — Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

Insider. — Includes any of the following:

If the debtor is an individual, any of the following:

A relative of the debtor or of a general partner of the debtor.

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner.

A general partner in a partnership in which the debtor is a general partner.

A corporation of which the debtor is a director, officer, or person in control.

If the debtor is a corporation, any of the following:

A director of the debtor.

An officer of the debtor.

A person in control of the debtor.

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner.

A general partner in a partnership in which the debtor is a general partner.

A relative of a general partner, director, officer, or person in control of the debtor.

If the debtor is a partnership, any of the following:

A general partner in the debtor.

A relative of a general partner in, a general partner of, or a person in control of the debtor.

Another partnership in which the debtor is a general partner.

A general partner in a partnership in which the debtor is a general partner.

A person in control of the debtor.

An affiliate, or an insider of an affiliate as if the affiliate were the debtor.

A managing agent of the debtor.

Lien. — A charge against or an interest in property to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation and includes a security interest created by agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings, a common-law
lien, or a statutory lien.

(8a)
Organization. — A person other than an individual.

Person. — An individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, or any other legal or commercial entity.

Property. — Anything that may be the subject of ownership.

(10a)
Record. — Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Relative. — An individual related by consanguinity within the third degree as determined in accordance with

G.S. 104A-1

, a spouse, or an individual related to a spouse within the third degree as so determined, and includes an individual in an adoptive relationship within the third degree. (11a) Sign. — With present intent to authenticate
or adopt a record, to do any of the following:

Execute or adopt a tangible symbol.

Attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

Transfer. — Every mode, direct or indirect, absolute or conditional, voluntary or involuntary, of disposing of or parting with an asset or an interest in an asset and includes payment of money, release, lease, license, and creation of a lien or other
encumbrance.

Valid lien. — A lien that is effective against the holder of a judicial lien subsequently obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-142, s. 7(a), effective December 14, 2018.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1; 2017-204, s. 3.3(a); 2018-142, s. 7(a).

Official Comment (2014)

The definition of “affiliate” is derived from Bankruptcy Code § 101(2) (1984).

The definition of “asset” is substantially to the same effect as the definition of “assets” in § 1 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. The definition in this Act, unlike that in the earlier Act, does not, however, require a determination that the
property is liable for the debts of the debtor. Thus, for example, an unliquidated claim for damages resulting from personal injury or a contingent claim of a surety for reimbursement, subrogation, restitution, contribution, or
the like, may be counted as an asset for the purpose of determining whether the holder of the claim is solvent as a debtor under § 2 of this Act, even if applicable law does not allow such an asset to be levied on and sold by a
creditor. Cf. Manufacturers & Traders Trust Co. v. Goldman (In re Ollag Construction Equipment Corp.), 578 F.2d 904, 907-09 (2d Cir. 1978).

The definition of “claim” is derived from Bankruptcy Code § 101(4) (1984). Because the purpose of this Act is primarily to protect unsecured creditors against transfers and obligations injurious to their rights, the words “claim” and “debt” as used in
the Act generally have reference to an unsecured claim and debt. As the context may indicate, however, usage of the terms is not so restricted. See, e.g., §§ 1(1)(i)(B) and 1(9).

The definition of “creditor” in combination with the definition of “claim” has substantially the same effect as the definition of “creditor” under § 1 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. As under that Act, the holder of an unliquidated tort claim
or a contingent claim may be a creditor protected by this Act.

The definition of “debt” is derived from Bankruptcy Code § 101(11) (1984).

The definition of “debtor” had no analogue in the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act.

The definition of “electronic” is the standard definition of that term used in acts prepared by the Uniform Law Commission as of 2014.

The definition of “insider” is derived from Bankruptcy Code § 101(28) (1984). In this Act, as in the Bankruptcy Code, the definition states that the term “includes” certain listed persons; it does not state that the term “means” the listed persons. Hence
the definition is not exclusive, and the statutory list is merely exemplary. See also Bankruptcy Code § 102(3) (1984). Accordingly, a person may be an “insider” of a debtor that is an individual, corporation or partnership even
though the person is not designated as such by the statutory list. For example, a trust may be found to be an “insider” of a beneficiary. Similarly, a court may find a person living with an individual debtor for an extended time
in the same household or as a permanent companion to have the kind of close relationship intended to be covered by the term “insider.” See also, e.g., Browning Interests v. Allison (In re Holloway), 955 F.2d 1008 (5th Cir.1992)
(former spouse of debtor was an “insider” because of their close and continued personal relationship, even though they had long ago divorced and remarried others). Likewise, a person may be an “insider” of a debtor that is not
an individual, corporation or partnership. See, e.g., In re Longview Aluminum, L.L.C., 657 F.3d 507 (7th Cir. 2011) (holding, under the Bankruptcy Code definition, that an individual serving on the Board of Managers of, and having
a 12% membership interest in, a limited liability company was an “insider” of the company; the company’s organic documents vested management authority “in the Board of Managers and the Members”).

The definition of “lien” is derived from paragraphs (30), (31), (43), and (45) of Bankruptcy Code § 101 (1984), which define “judicial lien,” “lien,” “security interest,” and “statutory lien” respectively.

The definition of “organization” is derived from Uniform Commercial Code § 1-201(b)(25) (2014).

The definition of “person” is the standard definition of that term used in acts prepared by the Uniform Law Commission as of 2014. Section 11 renders a “protected series” of a “series organization” a “person” for purposes of this Act, even though the
“protected series” may not qualify as a “person” under paragraph (11) of this section.

The definition of “property” is derived from Uniform Probate Code § 1-201(33) (1969). Property includes both real and personal property, whether tangible or intangible, and any interest in property, whether legal or equitable.

The definition of “record” is the standard definition of that term used in acts prepared by the Uniform Law Commission as of 2014.

The definition of “relative” is derived from Bankruptcy Code § 101(37) (1984) but is explicit in its references to the spouse of a debtor in view of uncertainty as to whether the common law determines degrees of relationship by affinity.

The definition of “sign” is the standard definition of that term used in acts prepared by the Uniform Law Commission as of 2014.

The definition of “transfer” is derived principally from Bankruptcy Code § 101(48) (1984). The definition of “conveyance” in § 1 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act was similarly comprehensive, and the references in this Act to “payment of money,
release, lease, and the creation of a lien or encumbrance” are derived from the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. While the definition in the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act did not explicitly refer to an involuntary transfer,
the decisions under that Act were generally consistent with an interpretation that covered such a transfer. See, e.g., Hearn 45 St. Corp. v. Jano, 283 N.Y. 139, 27 N.E.2d 814, 128 A.L.R. 1285 (1940) (execution and foreclosure sales);
Lefkowitz v. Finkelstein Trading Corp., 14 F. Supp. 898, 899 (S.D.N.Y. 1936) (execution sale); Langan v. First Trust & Deposit Co., 277 App.Div. 1090, 101 N.Y.S.2d 36 (4th Dept. 1950), aff’d, 302 N.Y. 932, 100 N.E.2d 189 (1951)
(mortgage foreclosure); Catabene v. Wallner, 16 N.J.Super. 597, 602, 85 A.2d 300, 302 (1951) (mortgage foreclosure). The 2014 amendments add a reference to transfer by “license,” which is derived from the definition of “proceeds”
in Uniform Commercial Code § 9-102(a)(64)(A) (2014).

The definition of “valid lien” had no analogue in the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. A valid lien includes an equitable lien that may not be defeated by a judicial lien creditor. See, e.g., Pearlman v. Reliance Insurance Co., 371 U.S. 132, 136 (1962)
(upholding a surety’s equitable lien in respect to a fund owing a bankrupt contractor).

Subparagraphs (i), (ii), and (iii) provide clarification by excluding from the term not only generally exempt property but also an interest in a tenancy by the entirety in many states and an interest that is generally beyond reach by unsecured creditors
because subject to a valid lien. This Act, like the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act and the Statute of 13 Elizabeth, declares rights and provides remedies for unsecured creditors against transfers that impede them in the collection
of their claims. The laws protecting valid liens against impairment by levying creditors, exemption statutes, and the rules restricting levyability of interest in entireties property are limitations on the rights and remedies of unsecured
creditors, and it is therefore appropriate to exclude property interests that are beyond the reach of unsecured creditors from the definition of “asset” for the purposes of this Act.

A creditor of a joint tenant or tenant in common may ordinarily collect a judgment by process against the tenant’s interest, and in some states a creditor of a tenant by the entirety may likewise collect a judgment by process against the tenant’s interest.
See 2 American Law of Property 10, 22, 28-32 (1952); Craig, An Analysis of Estates by the Entirety in Bankruptcy , 48 Am.Bankr.L.J. 255, 258-59 (1974). The levyable interest of such a tenant is included as an asset under this Act.

The definition of “assets” in the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act excluded property that is exempt from liability for debts. The definition did not, however, exclude all property that cannot be reached by a creditor through judicial proceedings to collect
a debt. Thus, it included the interest of a tenant by the entirety although in nearly half the states such an interest cannot be subjected to liability for a debt unless it is an obligation owed jointly by the debtor with his or her
cotenant by the entirety. See 2 American Law of Property 29 (1952); Craig, An Analysis of Estates by the Entirety in Bankruptcy , 48 Am.Bankr.L.J. 255, 258 (1974). The definition in this Act requires exclusion of interests in property
held by tenants by the entirety that are not subject to collection process by a creditor without a right to proceed against both tenants by the entirety as joint debtors.

The reference to “generally exempt” property in § 1(2)(ii) recognizes that all exemptions are subject to exceptions. Creditors having special rights against generally exempt property typically include claimants for alimony, taxes, wages, the purchase
price of the property, and labor or materials that improve the property. See Uniform Exemptions Act § 10 (1979) and the accompanying Comment. The fact that a particular creditor may reach generally exempt property by resorting to judicial
process does not warrant its inclusion as an asset in determining whether the debtor is insolvent.

Because this Act is not an exclusive law on the subject of voidable transfers and obligations (see Comment 9 to § 4), it does not preclude the holder of a claim that may be collected by process against property generally exempt as to other creditors from
obtaining relief from a transfer of such property that hinders, delays, or defrauds the holder of such a claim. Likewise the holder of an unsecured claim enforceable against tenants by the entirety is not precluded by the Act from
pursuing a remedy against a transfer of property held by the entirety that hinders, delays, or defrauds the holder of such a claim.

Nonbankruptcy law is the law of a state or federal law that is not part of the Bankruptcy Code, Title 11 of the United States Code. The definition of an “asset” thus does not include property that would be subject to administration for the benefit of
creditors under the Bankruptcy Code unless it is subject under other applicable law, state or federal, to process for the collection of a creditor’s claim against a single debtor.

The differences between the definition in this Act and that in the Bankruptcy Code are slight. In this Act, the definition has been restricted in clauses (i)(C), (ii)(E), and (iii)(D) to make clear that a partner is not an insider of an individual, corporation,
or partnership if any of these latter three persons is only a limited partner. The definition of “insider” in the Bankruptcy Code does not purport to make a limited partner an insider of the partners or of the partnership with which
the limited partner is associated, but it is susceptible of a contrary interpretation and one which would extend unduly the scope of the defined relationship when the limited partner is not a person in control of the partnership. The
definition of “insider” in this Act also omits the reference in Bankruptcy Code § 101(28)(D) (1984) to an elected official or relative of such an official as an insider of a municipality.

§ 39-23.2.
Insolvency.

A debtor is insolvent if, at a fair valuation, the sum of the debtor’s debts is greater than the sum of the debtor’s assets.

A debtor that is generally not paying the debtor’s debts as they become due other than as a result of a bona fide dispute is presumed to be insolvent. The presumption imposes on the party against which the presumption is directed the burden of proving
that the nonexistence of insolvency is more probable than its existence.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-23, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to a transfer made or obligation incurred on or after that date.

Assets under this section do not include property that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or that has been transferred in a manner making transfer voidable under this Article.

Debts under this section do not include an obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on property of the debtor not included as an asset.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

Subsection (a) is derived from the definition of “insolvent” in Bankruptcy Code § 101(29)(A) (1984). The definition in subsection (a) contemplates a fair valuation of the debts as well as the assets of the debtor. The 2014 amendments reword subsection
(a) in order to eliminate the elegant variation in the original text between “the sum of” debts and “all of” assets, and to make clearer that “fair valuation” applies to debts as well as to assets. No change in meaning is intended.

Subsection (b) establishes a rebuttable presumption of insolvency from the fact of general nonpayment of debts as they become due. Such general nonpayment is a ground for the filing of an involuntary petition under Bankruptcy Code § 303(h)(1) (1978).
See also U.C.C. § 1-201(23) (1962) (defining a person to be “insolvent” who “has ceased to pay his debts in the ordinary course of business”). The 2014 amendments to this Act clarify that general nonpayment of debts does not count
nonpayment as a result of a bona fide dispute. That was the intended meaning of the language before 2014, as stated in the official comments, and the cited provisions of the Bankruptcy Code and the Uniform Commercial Code have
been similarly clarified. See Bankruptcy Code § 303(h)(1) (2014); U.C.C. § 1-203(b)(23) (2014) (defining “insolvent” to include “having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business other than as a result of
bona fide dispute”).

Subsection (c) follows the approach of the definition of “insolvency” in Bankruptcy Code § 101(29) (1984) by excluding from the computation of the value of the debtor’s assets any value that can be realized only by avoiding a transfer of an interest formerly
held by the debtor or by discovery or pursuit of property that has been concealed or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors.

Subsection (d) has no analogue in Bankruptcy Code § 101(29) (1984). It makes clear that a person is not rendered insolvent under this section by counting as a debt an obligation secured by property of the debtor that is not counted as an asset. See also
Comment 2 to § 1 and Comment 1 to § 2.

Financial accounting standards may permit or require fair value measurement of an asset or a debt. The fair value of an asset or a debt for financial accounting purposes may be based on standards that are not appropriate for use in subsection (a). For
example, Fin. Accounting Standards Bd., Accounting Standards Codification /P¶ 820-10-35-17 to -18 (2014) (formerly Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 157: Fair Value Measurement ¶ 15 (2006)) requires for financial accounting
purposes that the “fair value” of a liability reflect nonperformance risk (i.e., the risk that the debtor will not pay the liability as and when due). By contrast, proper application of subsection (a) excludes any adjustment to the
face amount of a liability on account of nonperformance risk. Such an adjustment would be contrary to the purpose of subsection (a), which is to assess the risk that the debtor will not be able to satisfy its liabilities. Only in unusual
circumstances would the “fair valuation” for the purpose of subsection (a) of a liquidated debt be other than its face amount. Examples of such circumstances include discounting the face amount of a contingent debt to reflect the probability
that the contingency will not occur, and discounting the face amount of a non-interest-bearing debt that is due in the future in order to reduce the debt to its present value.

As under the definition of the term “insolvent” in § 2 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, exempt property is excluded from the computation of the value of the assets. See § 1(2). For similar reasons interests in valid spendthrift trusts and interests
in tenancies by the entireties that are not subject to process by a creditor of only one tenant are not included. See Comment 2 to § 1. Because a valid lien also precludes an unsecured creditor from collecting the creditor’s claim
from the encumbered interest in a debtor’s property, both the encumbered interest and the debt secured thereby are excluded from the computation of insolvency under this Act. See § 1(2) and subsection (d) of this section.

Subsection (b) defines the effect of the presumption to be (in paraphrase) that the burden of persuasion on the issue of insolvency shifts to the defendant. That conforms to the default definition of the effect of a presumption in civil cases set forth
in Uniform Rules of Evidence (1974 Act), Rule 301(a) (later Rule 302(a) (1999 Act as amended 2005)). It also conforms to the Final Draft of Federal Rule 301 as submitted to the United States Supreme Court by the Advisory Committee
on Federal Rules of Evidence in 1973. “The so-called ‘bursting bubble’ theory, under which a presumption vanishes upon the introduction of evidence which would support a finding of the nonexistence of the presumed fact, even though
not believed, is rejected as according presumptions too ‘slight and evanescent’ an effect.” Advisory Committee’s Note to Rule 301, 56 F.R.D. 183, 208 (1973). See also 1 J. Weinstein & M. Berger, Evidence ¶ 301[01] (1982). It should
be noted that the Federal Rule of Evidence as finally enacted gave by default a different effect to presumptions in civil cases, in effect adopting the “bursting bubble” definition. See Fed. R. Evid. 301 (1975) (carried forward in
the 2011 revision). The statement of the effect of the presumption in subsection (b) was added by the 2014 amendments to this Act, but subsection (b) was intended to have the same meaning before 2014, as stated in the official comments.

The presumption is established in recognition of the difficulties typically imposed on a creditor in proving insolvency in the bankruptcy sense, as provided in subsection (a). See generally Levit, The Archaic Concept of Balance-Sheet Insolvency, 47 Am.Bankr.L.J.
215 (1973). Not only is the relevant information in the possession of a debtor that is apt to be noncooperative, but the debtor’s records are apt to be incomplete and inaccurate. As a practical matter, insolvency is most cogently evidenced
by a general cessation of payment of debts, as has long been recognized by the laws of other countries and is now reflected in the Bankruptcy Code. See Honsberger,

Failure to Pay One’s Debts Generally as They Become Due: The Experience of France and Canada
, 54 Am.Bankr.L.J. 153 (1980); J. MacLachlan, Bankruptcy 13, 63-64, 436 (1956). In determining whether a debtor is paying its debts generally as they become due, the court should look at more than the amount and due dates
of the indebtedness. The court should also take into account such factors as the number of the debtor’s debts, the proportion of those debts not being paid, the duration of the nonpayment, and the existence of bona fide disputes or
other special circumstances alleged to constitute an explanation for the stoppage of payments. The court’s determination may be affected by a consideration of the debtor’s payment practices prior to the period of alleged nonpayment
and the payment practices of the trade or industry in which the debtor is engaged. The case law that has developed under Bankruptcy Code § 303(h)(1) (1984) has not required a showing that a debtor has failed or refused to pay a majority
in number and amount of the debtor’s debts in order to prove general nonpayment of debts as they become due. See,

e.g., Hill v. Cargill, Inc. .(In re Hill)
, 8 B.R. 779, 3 C.B.C.2d 920 (Bankr. D.Minn. 1981) (nonpayment of three largest debts held to constitute general nonpayment, although small debts were being paid);

In re All Media Properties, Inc
., 5 B.R. 126, 6 B.C.D. 586, 2 C.B.C.2d 449 (Bankr. S.D.Tex. 1980) (missing significant number of payments or regularly missing payments significant in amount said to constitute general nonpayment; missing payments on more
than 50% of aggregate of claims said not to be required to show general nonpayment; nonpayment for more than 30 days after billing held to establish nonpayment of a debt when it is due);

In re Kreidler Import Corp
., 4 B.R. 256, 6 B.C.D. 608, 2 C.B.C.2d 159 (Bankr. D.Md. 1980) (nonpayment of one debt constituting 97% of debtor’s total indebtedness held to constitute general nonpayment).

§ 39-23.3.
Value.

Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in exchange for the transfer or obligation, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied, but value does not include an unperformed promise made otherwise than in the ordinary
course of the promisor’s business to furnish support to the debtor or another person.

For the purposes of G.S. 39-23.4(a)(2) and

G.S. 39-23.5

, a person gives a reasonably equivalent value if the person acquires an interest of the debtor in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted, noncollusive foreclosure sale or execution of a power of sale for the
acquisition or disposition of the interest of the debtor upon default under a mortgage, deed of trust, or security agreement.

A transfer is made for present value if the exchange between the debtor and the transferee is intended by them to be contemporaneous and is in fact substantially contemporaneous.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 1998-217, s. 6.

Official Comment (2014)

This section defines when “value” is given for a transfer or an obligation. “Value” is used in that sense in various contexts in this Act, frequently with a qualifying adjective. Used in that sense the word appears in the following provisions:

Section 3(a) is adapted from Bankruptcy Code § 548(d)(2)(A) (1984). See also § 3(a) of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. The definition in Section 3 is not exclusive. “Value” is to be determined in light of the purpose of the Act to protect a debtor’s
estate from being depleted to the prejudice of the debtor’s unsecured creditors. Consideration having no utility from a creditor’s viewpoint does not satisfy the statutory definition. The definition does not specify all the kinds
of consideration that do not constitute value for the purposes of this Act—e.g., love and affection. See, e.g., United States v. West, 299 F. Supp. 661, 666 (D.Del. 1969).

Section 3(a) does not indicate what is “reasonably equivalent value” for a transfer or obligation. Under this Act, as under Bankruptcy Code § 548(a)(2) (1984), a transfer for security is ordinarily for a reasonably equivalent value notwithstanding a discrepancy
between the value of the asset transferred and the debt secured, because the amount of the debt is the measure of the value of the interest in the asset that is transferred. See, e.g., Peoples-Pittsburgh Trust Co. v. Holy Family
Polish Nat’l Catholic Church, Carnegie, Pa., 341 Pa. 390, 19 A.2d 360 (1941). If the debt is a voidable obligation under this Act, a transfer to secure it as well as the obligation would be vulnerable to attack as voidable. A transfer
to satisfy or secure an antecedent debt owed an insider is also subject to avoidance under the conditions specified in Section 5(b).

Section 3(a) of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act has been thought not to recognize that an unperformed promise could constitute fair consideration. See McLaughlin, Application of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, 46 Harv.L.Rev. 404, 414 (1933).
Courts construing these provisions of the prior law nevertheless have held unperformed promises to constitute value in a variety of circumstances. See, e.g., Harper v. Lloyd’s Factors, Inc., 214 F.2d 662 (2d Cir. 1954) (transfer
of money for promise of factor to discount transferor’s purchase-money notes given to fur dealer); Schlecht v. Schlecht, 168 Minn. 168, 176-77, 209 N.W. 883, 886-87 (1926) (transfer for promise to make repairs and improvements
on transferor’s homestead); Farmer’s Exchange Bank v. Oneida Motor Truck Co., 202 Wis. 266, 232 N.W. 536 (1930) transfer in consideration of assumption of certain of transferor’s liabilities; see also Hummel v. Cernocky, 161 F.2d
685 (7th Cir. 1947) (transfer in consideration of cash, assumption of a mortgage, payment of certain debts, and agreement to pay other debts). Likewise a transfer in consideration of a negotiable note discountable at a commercial
bank, or the purchase from an established, solvent institution of an insurance policy, annuity, or contract to provide care and accommodations clearly appears to be for value. On the other hand, an unperformed promise by an individual
to support a parent or other transferor has generally been held not to constitute value. See, e.g., Springfield Ins. Co. v. Fry, 267 F. Supp. 693 (N.D.Okla. 1967); Sandler v. Parlapiano, 236 App.Div. 70, 258 N.Y.Supp. 88 (1st Dep’t
1932); Warwick Municipal Employees Credit Union v. Higham, 106 R.I. 363, 259 A.2d 852 (1969); Hulsether v. Sanders, 54 S.D. 412, 223 N.W. 335 (1929); Cooper v. Cooper, 22 Tenn.App. 473, 477, 124 S.W.2d 264, 267 (1939); Note, Rights
of Creditors in Property Conveyed in Consideration of Future Support, 45 Iowa L.Rev. 546, 550-62 (1960). This Act adopts the view taken in the cases cited in determining whether an unperformed promise is value.

Subsection (b) rejects the rule of such cases as Durrett v. Washington Nat. Ins. Co., 621 F.2d 201 (5th Cir. 1980) (nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage avoided as a voidable transfer when the property of an insolvent mortgagor was sold for less than
70% of its fair value); and Abramson v. Lakewood Bank & Trust Co., 647 F.2d 547 (5th Cir. 1981), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 1164 (1982) (nonjudicial foreclosure held to be voidable transfer if made without fair consideration).
Subsection (b) adopts the view taken in Lawyers Title Ins. Corp. v. Madrid (In re Madrid), 21 B.R. 424 (B.A.P. 9th Cir. 1982), aff’d on another ground, 725 F.2d 1197 (9th Cir. 1984), that the price bid at a regularly conducted
and noncollusive foreclosure sale determines the fair value of the property sold for purposes of voidable transfer law. See also BFP v. Resolution Trust Corp., 511 U.S. 531, 537 n.3 (1994) (similarly construing Bankruptcy Code
§ 548; opinion expressly limited to foreclosure of real estate mortgages).

Subsection (c) is an adaptation of Bankruptcy Code § 547(c)(1) (1984). A transfer to an insider for an antecedent debt may be voidable under § 5(b).

4(a)(2) (“reasonably equivalent value”);

4(b)(8) (“value ... reasonably equivalent”);

5(a) (“reasonably equivalent value”);

8(a) (“reasonably equivalent value”);

8(b)(1)(ii)(A) and (d) (“value”);

8(f)(1) (“new value”); and

8(f)(3) (“present value”).

“Value” is also used in other senses in this Act, to which this section is not relevant. See, e.g. , §§ 8(b)(1), 8(c) (“value” in the sense of the value of a transferred asset).

Subsection (b) prescribes the effect of a sale meeting its requirements, whether the asset sold is personal or real property. It applies only to a sale under a mortgage, deed of trust, or security agreement. Subsection (b) thus does not apply to a sale
foreclosing a nonconsensual lien, such as a tax lien. However, the subsection does apply to a foreclosure by sale of the interest of a vendee under an installment land contract in accordance with applicable law that requires or permits
the foreclosure to be effected by a sale in the same manner as the foreclosure of a mortgage. See G. Osborne, G. Nelson, & D. Whitman, Real Estate Finance Law 83-84, 95-97 (1979).

If a lien given an insider for a present consideration is not perfected as against a subsequent bona fide purchaser or is so perfected after a delay following an extension of credit secured by the lien, foreclosure of the lien may result in a transfer
for an antecedent debt that is voidable under Section 5(b). Subsection (b) does not apply to an action under Section 4(a)(1) to avoid a transfer or obligation because made or incurred with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud
any creditor.